District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.20

Repealed

Procedures for electronic recording of interrogations.

Repealed.

Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-280, § 2, 50 DCR 886
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-351, § 201, 52 DCR 2275
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 201 of Electronic Recording Procedures and Penalties Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-41, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3042).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101 of Electronic Recording Procedures and Penalties Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-41, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3042).
Temporary Repeal of Section For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 201 of Electronic Recording Procedures and Penalties Temporary Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-1, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5424).
For temporary (225 day) additions, see § 101 to 103 of Electronic Recording Procedures and Penalties Temporary Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-1, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5424).